California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) The application for licensure was received by the board on or before August 31, 2020.

(ii) The application for registration was received by the board on or before August 31, 2020, and the registration was subsequently issued by the board.

(2) Coursework taken to meet deficiencies in the required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be the equivalent of three semester units or four quarter units of study.

(3) The board shall make the final determination as to whether a degree meets all requirements, including, but not limited to, course requirements, regardless of accreditation.

(e) In addition to the degree described in this section, or as part of that degree, an applicant shall complete the following coursework or training prior to registration as an associate:

(1) A minimum of 15 contact hours of instruction in alcoholism and other chemical substance abuse dependency, as specified by regulation.

(2) A minimum of 10 contact hours of training or coursework in human sexuality as specified in Section 25, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(3) A two semester unit or three quarter unit
 survey course in psychopharmacology.

(4) A minimum of 15 contact hours of instruction in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies, including knowledge of community resources, cultural factors, and same gender abuse dynamics.

(5) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting as specified in Section 28 and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(6) A minimum of 18 contact hours of instruction in California law and professional ethics for professional clinical counselors that includes, but is not limited to, instruction in advertising, scope of practice, scope of competence, treatment of minors, confidentiality, dangerous clients, psychotherapist-client privilege, recordkeeping, client access to records, dual relationships, child abuse,
 elder and dependent adult abuse, online therapy, insurance reimbursement, civil liability, disciplinary actions and unprofessional conduct, ethics complaints and ethical standards, termination of therapy, standards of care, relevant family law, therapist disclosures to clients, and state and federal laws related to confidentiality of patient health information. When coursework in a master’s or doctoral degree program is acquired to satisfy this requirement, it shall be considered as part of the 48 semester unit or 72 quarter unit requirement in subdivision (c).

(7) A minimum of 10 contact hours of instruction in aging and long-term care, which may include, but is not limited to, the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging. On and after January 1, 2012, this coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(8) A minimum of 15 contact hours of instruction in crisis or trauma counseling, including multidisciplinary responses to crises, emergencies, or disasters, and brief, intermediate, and long-term approaches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 61.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.33.

(a) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Applicants for licensure or registration who begin graduate study before August 1, 2012, and do not complete that study on or before December 31, 2018.

(2) Applicants for licensure or registration who begin graduate study before August 1, 2012, and who graduate from a degree program that meets the requirements of this section.

(3) Applicants for licensure or registration who begin graduate study on or after August 1, 2012.

(b) To qualify for licensure or registration, applicants shall possess a master’s or doctoral degree
 that is counseling or psychotherapy in content and that meets the requirements of this section, obtained from an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12. For purposes of this subdivision, a degree is “counseling or psychotherapy in content” if it contains the supervised practicum or field study experience described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) and, except as provided in subdivision (f), the coursework in the core content areas listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(c) The degree described in subdivision (b) shall be a single, integrated program that contains not less than 60 graduate semester units or 90 graduate quarter units of instruction, which shall, except as provided in subdivision (f), include all of the following:

(1) The equivalent of at least three semester units or four quarter units of
 graduate study in all of the following core content areas:

(A) Counseling and psychotherapeutic theories and techniques, including the counseling process in a multicultural society, an orientation to wellness and prevention, counseling theories to assist in selection of appropriate counseling interventions, models of counseling consistent with current professional research and practice, development of a personal model of counseling, and multidisciplinary responses to crises, emergencies, and disasters.

(B) Human growth and development across the lifespan, including normal and abnormal behavior and an understanding of developmental crises, disability, psychopathology, and situational and environmental factors that affect both normal and abnormal behavior.

(C) Career development theories and techniques, including
 career development decisionmaking models and interrelationships among and between work, family, and other life roles and factors, including the role of multicultural issues in career development.

(D) Group counseling theories and techniques, including principles of group dynamics, group process components, group developmental stage theories, therapeutic factors of group work, group leadership styles and approaches, pertinent research and literature, group counseling methods, and evaluation of effectiveness.

(E) Assessment, appraisal, and testing of individuals, including basic concepts of standardized and nonstandardized testing and other assessment techniques, norm-referenced and criterion-referenced assessment, statistical concepts, social and cultural factors related to assessment and evaluation of individuals and groups, and ethical strategies for selecting, administering, and
 interpreting assessment instruments and techniques in counseling.

(F) Multicultural counseling theories and techniques, including counselors’ roles in developing cultural self-awareness, identity development, promoting cultural social justice, individual and community strategies for working with and advocating for diverse populations, and counselors’ roles in eliminating biases and prejudices, and processes of intentional and unintentional oppression and discrimination.

(G) Principles of the diagnostic process, including differential diagnosis, and the use of current diagnostic tools, such as the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, the impact of co-occurring substance use disorders or medical psychological disorders, established diagnostic criteria for mental or emotional disorders, and the treatment modalities and placement criteria
 within the continuum of care.

(H) Research and evaluation, including studies that provide an understanding of research methods, statistical analysis, the use of research to inform evidence-based practice, the importance of research in advancing the profession of counseling, and statistical methods used in conducting research, needs assessment, and program evaluation.

(I) Professional orientation, ethics, and law in counseling, including California law and professional ethics for professional clinical counselors, professional ethical standards and legal considerations, licensing law and process, regulatory laws that delineate the profession’s scope of practice, counselor-client privilege, confidentiality, the client dangerous to self or others, treatment of minors with or without parental consent, relationship between practitioner’s sense of self and human values, functions and
 relationships with other human service providers, strategies for collaboration, and advocacy processes needed to address institutional and social barriers that impede access, equity, and success for clients.

(J) Psychopharmacology, including the biological bases of behavior, basic classifications, indications, and contraindications of commonly prescribed psychopharmacological medications so that appropriate referrals can be made for medication evaluations and so that the side effects of those medications can be identified.

(K) Addictions counseling, including substance abuse, co-occurring disorders, and addiction, major approaches to identification, evaluation, treatment, and prevention of substance abuse and addiction, legal and medical aspects of substance abuse, populations at risk, the role of support persons, support systems, and community resources.

(L) Crisis or trauma counseling, including crisis theory; multidisciplinary responses to crises, emergencies, or disasters; cognitive, affective, behavioral, and neurological effects associated with trauma; brief, intermediate, and long-term approaches; and assessment strategies for clients in crisis and principles of intervention for individuals with mental or emotional disorders during times of crisis, emergency, or disaster.

(M) Advanced counseling and psychotherapeutic theories and techniques, including the application of counseling constructs, assessment and treatment planning, clinical interventions, therapeutic relationships, psychopathology, or other clinical topics.

(2) In addition to the course requirements described in paragraph (1), 15 semester units or 22.5 quarter units of advanced coursework to develop
 knowledge of specific treatment issues or special populations.

(3) Not less than six semester units or nine quarter units of supervised practicum or field study experience that involves direct client contact in a clinical setting that provides a range of professional clinical counseling experience, including the following:

(A) Applied psychotherapeutic techniques.

(B) Assessment.

(C) Diagnosis.

(D) Prognosis.

(E) Treatment planning.

(F) Treatment.

(G) Issues of development, adjustment, and
 maladjustment.

(H) Health and wellness promotion.

(I) Professional writing including documentation of services, treatment plans, and progress notes.

(J) How to find and use resources.

(K) Other recognized counseling interventions.

(L) A minimum of 280 hours of face-to-face supervised clinical experience counseling individuals, families, or groups.

(d) The 60 graduate semester units or 90 graduate quarter units of instruction required pursuant to subdivision (c) shall, in addition to meeting the requirements of subdivision (c), include instruction in all of the following:

(1) The understanding of human behavior within the social context of socioeconomic status and other contextual issues affecting social position.

(2) The understanding of human behavior within the social context of a representative variety of the cultures found within California.

(3) Cultural competency and sensitivity, including a familiarity with the racial, cultural, linguistic, and ethnic backgrounds of persons living in California.

(4) An understanding of the effects of socioeconomic status on treatment and available resources.

(5) Multicultural development and cross-cultural interaction, including experiences of race, ethnicity, class, spirituality, sexual orientation, gender, and disability and their incorporation into the
 psychotherapeutic process.

(6) Case management, systems of care for the severely mentally ill, public and private services for the severely mentally ill, community resources for victims of abuse, disaster and trauma response, advocacy for the severely mentally ill, and collaborative treatment. The instruction required in this paragraph may be provided either in credit level coursework or through extension programs offered by the degree-granting institution.

(7) Human sexuality, including the study of the physiological, psychological, and social cultural variables associated with sexual behavior, gender identity, and the assessment and treatment of psychosexual dysfunction.

(8) Spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, intervention strategies, and same gender abuse dynamics.

(9) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting, as specified in Section 28, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(10) Aging and long-term care, including biological, social, cognitive, and psychological aspects of aging. This coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(e) A degree program that qualifies for licensure under this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Integrate the principles of mental health recovery-oriented care and methods of service delivery in recovery-oriented practice environments.

(2) Integrate an
 understanding of various cultures and the social and psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(3) Provide the opportunity for students to meet with various consumers and family members of consumers of mental health services to enhance understanding of their experience of mental illness, treatment, and recovery.

(f) (1) (A) An applicant whose degree is deficient in no more than three of the required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) may satisfy those deficiencies by successfully completing post-master’s or postdoctoral degree coursework at an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an applicant shall not be deficient in the required
 areas of study specified in subparagraphs (E) or (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) unless the applicant meets one of the following criteria and remediates the deficiency:

(i) The application for licensure was received by the board on or before August 31, 2020.

(ii) The application for registration was received by the board on or before August 31, 2020, and the registration was subsequently issued by the board.

(2) Coursework taken to meet deficiencies in the required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be the equivalent of three semester units or four quarter units of study.

(3) The board shall make the final determination as to whether a degree meets all requirements, including,
 but not limited to, course requirements, regardless of accreditation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 62.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.36.

(a) A clinical counselor trainee may perform activities and services provided that the activities and services constitute part of the clinical counselor trainee’s supervised course of study and that the person is designated by the title “clinical counselor trainee.”

(b) All practicum and field study hours gained as a clinical counselor trainee shall be coordinated between the school and the site where hours are being accrued. The school shall approve each site and shall have a written agreement with each site that details each party’s responsibilities, including the methods by which supervision shall be provided. The agreement shall provide for regular progress reports and evaluations of the student’s performance at the site.

(c) If an applicant has gained practicum and field study hours while enrolled in an institution other than the one that confers the qualifying degree, it shall be the applicant’s responsibility to provide to the board satisfactory evidence that those practicum and field study hours were gained in compliance with this section.

(d) A clinical counselor trainee shall inform each client or patient, prior to performing any professional services, that he or she is unlicensed and under supervision.

(e) No hours earned while a clinical counselor trainee may count toward the 3,000 hours of required postdegree supervised experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 38.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.40.

(a) Each educational institution preparing applicants to qualify for licensure shall notify each of its students by means of its public documents or otherwise in writing that its degree program is designed to meet the requirements of Section 4999.32 or 4999.33 and shall certify to the board that it has so notified its students.

(b) An applicant for registration or licensure shall submit to the board a certification by the applicant’s educational institution that the institution’s required curriculum for graduation and any associated coursework completed by the applicant does one of the following:

(1) Meets all of the requirements set forth in Section
 4999.32.

(2) Meets all of the requirements set forth in Section 4999.33.

(c) An applicant trained at an educational institution outside the United States shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that he or she possesses a qualifying degree that is equivalent to a degree earned from an institution of higher education that is accredited or approved. These applicants shall provide the board with a comprehensive evaluation of the degree performed by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member of the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services and shall provide any other documentation the board deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 42.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.42.

(a) An applicant shall meet all of the following qualifications to qualify for registration as an associate:

(1) Earned a master’s or doctoral degree as specified in Section 4999.32 or 4999.33, as applicable. An applicant whose education qualifies the applicant under Section 4999.32 shall also have completed the coursework or training specified in subdivision (e) of Section 4999.32.

(2) Be at least 18 years of age.

(3) Not be subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.

(b) (1) The board shall not issue a registration to any person who has
 been convicted of a crime in this or another state or in a territory of the United States that involves sexual abuse of children or who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code or the equivalent in another state or territory.

(2) A denial issued pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the conditions for denial specified in Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 63.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all applicants shall have an active associate registration with the board in order to gain postdegree hours of supervised experience.

(b) (1) Postdegree hours of experience gained before the issuance of an associate registration shall be credited toward licensure if all of the following apply:

(A) The registration applicant applies for the associate registration and the board receives the application within 90 days of the granting of the qualifying master’s degree or doctoral degree.

(B) For applicants
 completing graduate study on or after January 1, 2020, the experience is obtained at a workplace that, prior to the registration applicant gaining supervised experience hours, requires completed Live Scan fingerprinting. The applicant shall provide the board with a copy of that completed State of California “Request for Live Scan Service” form with their application for licensure.

(C) The board subsequently grants the associate registration.

(2) The applicant shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or a professional corporation until they have been issued an associate registration by the board.

(c) Supervised experience that is obtained for the purposes of qualifying for licensure shall be related to the
 practice of professional clinical counseling and comply with the following:

(1) A minimum of 3,000 postdegree hours performed over a period of not less than two years (104 weeks).

(2) Not more than 40 hours in any seven consecutive days.

(3) Not less than 1,750 hours of direct clinical counseling with individuals, groups, couples, or families using a variety of psychotherapeutic techniques and recognized counseling interventions.

(4) A maximum of 1,250 hours of nonclinical practice, consisting of direct supervisor contact, administering and evaluating psychological tests, writing clinical reports, writing progress or process notes, client-centered
 advocacy, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to professional clinical counseling that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.

(5) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(d) An individual who submits an application for licensure between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2020, may alternatively qualify under the experience requirements of this section that were in place on January 1, 2015.

(e) Experience hours shall not have been gained more than six years
 prior to the date the application for licensure was received by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 22.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.1.

(a) An associate or applicant for licensure shall be under the supervision of a supervisor at all times. 

(b) An associate shall do both of the following:

(1) Inform each client, before performing any professional services, that the associate is unlicensed and under supervision.

(2) Renew the registration a maximum of five times. A registration shall not be renewed or reinstated beyond six years from the last day of the month during which it was issued, regardless of whether it has been revoked.

(c) When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and
 obtain a subsequent associate registration number if the applicant meets the educational requirements for a subsequent associate registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination. An applicant issued a subsequent associate registration number shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 64.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.2.

(a) Except for experience gained by attending workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.46, direct supervisor contact shall occur as follows:

(1) Supervision shall include at least one hour of direct supervisor contact in each week for which experience is credited in each work setting.

(2) A trainee shall receive an average of at least one hour of direct supervisor contact for every five hours of direct clinical counseling performed each week in each setting.

(3) An associate
 gaining experience who performs more than 10 hours of direct clinical counseling in a week in any setting shall receive at least one additional hour of direct supervisor contact for that setting. For experience gained after January 1, 2009, no more than six hours of supervision, whether individual supervision, triadic supervision, or group supervision, shall be credited during any single week.

(4) Of the 104 weeks of required supervision, 52 weeks shall be individual supervision, triadic supervision, or a combination of both.

(b) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “one hour of direct supervisor contact” means any of the following:

(A) Individual supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face
 contact between one supervisor and one person receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(B) Triadic supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and two persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(C) Group supervision, which means two hours of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and no more than eight persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services. Segments of group supervision may be split into no less than one continuous hour. The supervisor shall ensure that the amount and degree of supervision is appropriate for each person in the group.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “face-to-face
 contact” means in-person contact, contact via two-way, real-time videoconferencing, or some combination of these.

(c) The supervisor shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with federal and state laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information.

(d) (1) Within 60 days of the commencement of supervision, a supervisor shall conduct a meeting with the supervisee during which the supervisor shall assess the appropriateness of allowing the supervisee to receive supervision via two-way, real-time videoconferencing. This assessment of appropriateness shall include, but is not limited to, the abilities of the supervisee, the preferences of both the supervisee and supervisor, and the privacy of the locations of the supervisee and supervisor while
 supervision is conducted.

(2) The supervisor shall document the results of the assessment made pursuant to paragraph (1), and shall not utilize supervision via two-way, real-time videoconferencing if their assessment finds it is not appropriate.

(e) Direct supervisor contact shall occur within the same week as the hours claimed.

(f) Alternative supervision may be arranged during a supervisor’s vacation or sick leave if the alternative supervision meets the requirements in this chapter.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, once the required number of experience hours are gained, associates and applicants for licensure shall receive a minimum of one
 hour of direct supervisor contact per week for each practice setting in which direct clinical counseling is performed. Once the required number of experience hours are gained, further supervision for nonclinical practice, as
 defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.46, shall be at the supervisor’s discretion.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 88.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.3.

(a) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services as an employee or volunteer, and not as an independent contractor. The requirements of this chapter regarding hours of experience and supervision shall apply equally to employees and volunteers. A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall not perform any services or gain any experience within the scope of practice of the profession, as defined in Section 4999.20, as an independent contractor. While an associate may be either a paid employee or a volunteer, employers are encouraged to provide fair remuneration.

(1) If
 employed, an associate shall provide the board, upon application for licensure, with copies of the corresponding W-2 tax forms for each year of experience claimed. For experience gained during a tax year that has not ended by the date the associate’s application for licensure is received by the board, the associate shall provide the board with a copy of their most recent pay stub.

(2) If volunteering, an associate shall provide the board, upon application for licensure, with a letter from their employer verifying the associate’s status as a volunteer during the dates the experience was gained.

(b) A clinical counselor trainee shall not perform services in a private practice or professional corporation.

(c) A
 trainee shall complete the required predegree supervised practicum or field study experience in a setting that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is not a private practice or a professional corporation.

(2) Lawfully and regularly provides mental health counseling or psychotherapy.

(3) Provides oversight to ensure that the clinical counselor trainee’s work at the setting meets the experience and supervision requirements in this chapter and is within the scope of practice of the profession, as defined in Section 4999.20.

(4) Only experience gained in the position for which the clinical counselor trainee volunteers or is employed shall qualify as supervised
 practicum or field study experience.

(d) (1) An associate may be credited with supervised experience completed in any setting that meets both of the following:

(A) Lawfully and regularly provides mental health counseling or psychotherapy.

(B) Provides oversight to ensure that the associate’s work at the setting meets the experience and supervision requirements in this chapter and is within the scope of practice for the profession, as defined in Section 4999.20.

(2) Only experience gained in the position for which the associate volunteers or is employed shall qualify as supervised experience.

(3) An applicant for registration as an associate shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or professional corporation until they have been issued an associate registration by the board.

(e) Any experience obtained under the supervision of a spouse, relative, or domestic partner shall not be credited toward the required hours of supervised experience. Any experience obtained under the supervision of a supervisor with whom the applicant has had or currently has a personal, professional, or business relationship that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision shall not be credited toward the required hours of supervised experience.

(f) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall not receive any
 remuneration from patients or clients and shall only be paid by their employer, if an employee.

(g) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall have no proprietary interest in their employer’s business and shall not lease or rent space, pay for furnishings, equipment, or supplies, or in any other way pay for the obligations of their employer.

(h) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure who provides voluntary services in any lawful work setting and who only receives reimbursement for expenses actually incurred shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant for licensure who receives reimbursement for expenses and the applicant for licensure shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payments received were
 for reimbursement of expenses actually incurred.

(i) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment from a program designed to encourage demographically underrepresented groups to enter the profession or to improve recruitment and retention in underserved regions or settings shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment and the applicant shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payments were for the specified purposes.

(j) A clinical counselor trainee or associate may provide services via telehealth that are in the scope of practice outlined in this chapter.

(k) Each educational institution preparing applicants pursuant to this chapter shall consider requiring, and shall encourage, its students to undergo individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Each supervisor shall consider, advise, and encourage their associates and trainees regarding the advisability of undertaking individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Insofar as it is deemed appropriate and is desired by the applicant, educational institutions and supervisors are encouraged to assist the applicant to locate that counseling or psychotherapy at a reasonable cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 90.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.4.

(a) A clinical counselor trainee, associate, or applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services at the places where their employer permits business to be conducted.

(b) An associate who is employed by or volunteering in a private practice or a professional corporation shall be supervised by an individual who is both of the following:

(1) Is employed by or contracted by the associate’s employer or is an owner of the private practice or professional corporation.

(2) Either provides psychotherapeutic services to clients for the associate’s
 employer, or meets both of the following:

(A) The supervisor and the associate’s employer have a written contract providing the supervisor the same access to the associate’s clinical records provided to employees of that employer.

(B) The associate’s clients authorize the release of their clinical records to the supervisor.

(c) At any one time, supervisors in nonexempt settings shall not serve as individual or triadic supervisors for more than a total of six persons who are not fully licensed at the highest level for independent clinical practice and who are receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services in a nonexempt
 setting.

(d) A written oversight agreement, as specified by the board by regulation, shall be executed between the supervisor and employer when the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer. The supervisor shall evaluate the site or sites where the supervisee will be gaining experience to determine that the site or sites comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 16.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.46.5.

The board may audit the records of any supervisor to verify the completion of the supervisor qualifications specified by this chapter and by regulation. A supervisor shall maintain records of completion of the required supervisor qualifications for seven years after termination of supervision and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 48.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.48.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding the supervision of associates that may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Supervisor qualifications.

(b) Continuing education requirements of supervisors.

(c) Registration or licensing of supervisors, or both.

(d) General responsibilities of supervisors.

(e) The board’s authority in cases of noncompliance or gross or repeated negligence by supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 41.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.50.

(a) The board may issue a professional clinical counselor license to any person who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) He or she has received a master’s or doctoral degree described in Section 4999.32 or 4999.33, as applicable.

(2) He or she has completed at least 3,000 hours of supervised experience in the practice of professional clinical counseling.

(3) He or she provides evidence of a passing score, as determined by the board, on the examinations designated in Section 4999.53.

(b) An applicant for licensure who has satisfied the requirements of this chapter
 shall be issued a license as a professional clinical counselor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 50.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.51.

An applicant for licensure as a professional clinical counselor or registration as an associate shall satisfy the following qualifications:

(a) Not be subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.

(b) (1) Not have been convicted of a crime in this or another state or in a territory of the United States that involves sexual abuse of children or who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code or the equivalent in another state or territory.

(2) A denial issued pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the conditions for denial specified in Section 480.

(c) Have successfully passed a state and federal level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice by submitting fingerprint images and other information to the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining records of state and federal convictions and arrests. The board shall request the subsequent arrest notification service on all applicants, pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 65.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.52.

(a) Every applicant for a license as a professional clinical counselor shall take one or more examinations, as determined by the board, to ascertain their knowledge, professional skills, and judgment in the utilization of appropriate techniques and methods of professional clinical counseling.

(b) The examinations shall be given at least twice a year at a time and place and under supervision as the board may determine.

(c) The board shall not deny any applicant admission to an examination who has submitted a complete application for examination admission if the applicant meets the educational and experience requirements of
 this chapter and has not committed any acts or engaged in any conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(d) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s clinical examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.

(e) If an applicant for the examination specified by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53, who has passed the California law and ethics examination, is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure, the
 board shall permit the applicant to take this examination, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination, or the examination specified by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53, permission to retake either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaints against the applicant.

(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Section 11503 or 11504 of the